Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Oregon Military Department, for the biennium
beginning July 1,  2019, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following
purposes:
(1) Administration..........................  $ 5,279,710
(2) Operations.................................  $ 8,070,438
(3) Emergency management...........  $ 7,794,510
(4) Community support ..................  $ 605,613
(5) Debt service ..............................  $ 11,639,970
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts and re-
imbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in this section, collected or received by the Oregon Military Department, for
the following purposes:
(1) Administration.......................... $ 2,637,158
(2) Operations................................. $ 5,012,166
(3) Emergency management ........... $100,626,256
(4) Community support .................. $ 4,116,380
(5) Debt service .............................. $ 100,050
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds, other than those  described in section 2 of this 2019 Act,
collected or received by the Oregon Military Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 97,346,048
(2) Emergency management ........... $173,285,759
(3) Community support .................. $ 14,785,081
(4) Capital improvement................. $ 5,133,694
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled House Bill 5031 (HB 5031-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 12, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 19, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5031 (HB 5031-A) Page 2